Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.090

Reporting to the department of commerce.

(1) Prior to issuance of any revenue bonds, each public corporation shall submit a copy of its enabling ordinance and charter, a description of any industrial development facility proposed to be undertaken, and the basis for its qualification as an industrial development facility to the department of commerce.

(2) If the industrial development facility is not eligible under this chapter, the department of commerce shall give notice to the public corporation, in writing and by certified mail, within twelve working days of receipt of the description.

(3) The department of commerce shall provide such advice and assistance to public corporations and municipalities which have created or may wish to create public corporations as the public corporations or municipalities request and the department of commerce considers appropriate.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2030; 1998 c 245 s 34; 1995 c 399 s 56; 1987 c 505 s 22; 1985 c 466 s 46; 1981 c 300 s 9.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.

Department of commerce: Chapter 43.330 RCW.